Maryland, session 2026, HB1588.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Estates and Trusts
2–108.
(v) (1) Each judge of the Court for Wicomico County shall receive an annual
salary of [$11,600] $16,000 to be paid quarterly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, in accordance with Article
III, § 35 of the Maryland Constitution, this Act may not be construed to extend or apply to
the salary or compensation of a judge of the Orphans’ Court for Wicomico County while
serving in a term of office beginning before the effective date of this Act, but the provisions
of this Act concerning the salary or compensation of a judge of the Orphans’ Court for
Wicomico County shall take effect at the beginning of the next following term of office. This
limitation does not apply to an individual appointed or elected after the effective date of
this Act to fill out an unexpired term.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1588*

HOUSE BILL 1588
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.